Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.430

Criminal prosecution in city's name for violation of ordinances.

All criminal prosecutions for the violation of a city ordinance shall be conducted in the name of the city and may be upon the complaint of any person.

[ 1984 c 258 s 119; 1961 c 299 s 92.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.